Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6163.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 71A.18.060 and 2022 c 219 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Expenditures for the individual and family services waiver and the basic plus waiver administered under ((Title 71A RCW))this title must be considered by the governor and the legislature for inclusion in maintenance level budgets beginning with the governor's budget proposal submitted in December 2022 and funding for these expenditures are subject to amounts appropriated for this specific purpose. The department of social and health services must annually submit a budget request for these expenditures.(2) Beginning with the governor's budget proposal submitted in December 2022 and within the department's existing appropriations, the department of social and health services must annually submit a budget request for expenditures for the number of individuals who are expected to reside in state-operated living alternatives administered by the developmental disabilities administration under ((Title 71A RCW))this title.(3) Expenditures for the individual and family services waiver administered under this title must be included in maintenance level budgets beginning with the governor's budget proposal submitted in December 2026. The department of social and health services must annually submit a budget request for these expenditures.--- END ---